Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3422
Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act, how cited.

Sections 71-3422 to 71-3437 shall be known and may be cited as the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 79.